Utah statutes.
17-19a-102.   Definitions.

(1)  "Account" or "accounting" means:

(a)  the systematic recording, classification, or summarizing of a financial transaction or event; and

(b)  the interpretation or presentation of the result of an action described in Subsection (1)(a).

(2)  "Audit" or "auditing" means an examination that is a formal analysis of a county account or county financial record:

(a)  to verify accuracy, completeness, or compliance with an internal control;

(b)  to give a fair presentation of a county's financial status; and

(c)  that conforms to the uniform classification of accounts established by the state auditor.

(3)  "Book" means a financial record of the county, regardless of a record's format.

(4) (a)  "Budget" or "budgeting" means a process or activity conducted by the budget officer related to the preparation or presentation of a proposed or tentative budget as provided in Chapter 36, Uniform Fiscal Procedures Act for Counties.

(b)  "Budget" or "budgeting" includes:

(i)  a revenue projection;

(ii)  a budget request compilation; or

(iii)  the performance of an activity described in Subsection (4)(b)(i) or (ii).

(5)  "Budget officer" means a person described in Section 17-19a-203.

(6) (a)  "Claim" means under the color of law:

(i)  a demand presented for money or damages; or

(ii)  a cause of action presented for money or damages.

(b)  "Claim" does not mean a routine, uncontested, or regular payment, including a bill, purchase, or payroll.

(7)  "Performance audit" means a review and audit as described in Subsection 17-19a-206(3) of a county program, county operation, county management system, or county agency to:

(a)  review procedures, activities, or policies; and

(b)  determine whether the county is achieving the best levels of economy, efficiency, effectiveness, and compliance.

